South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5740.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-29-10(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E)(1) For an applicant who has executed an affidavit that he or she is an alien lawfully present in the United States, eligibility for benefits shall be made through the Systematic Alien Verification of Entitlement (SAVE) program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security or a successor program designated by the United States Department of Homeland Security. Until the eligibility verification is made, the affidavit shall be presumed to be proof of lawful presence for the purposes of this article. (2) For an applicant who is determined not to be an alien lawfully present in the United States, the state agency or political subdivision shall refer the applicant's information, including unsatisfactory immigration status, to United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----